Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin LESSEES OF CERTAIN REAL PROPERTY; TAX STATEMENTS.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 275.065, subdivision 3; Minnesota Statutes, section 276.04, subdivision 3; or any other law to the contrary, a lessee of real property located in an eligible city may file their name and mailing address with the county auditor in the county where the land is located for the purpose of receiving a notice of proposed property tax statement issued under Minnesota Statutes, section 275.065, and the property tax statement issued under Minnesota Statutes, section 276.04. For purposes of this section, "eligible city" means a city with a population greater than 940 but less than 960 according to the 2020 federal census, and located within a county with a population greater than 190,000 but less than 210,000 according to the 2020 federal census. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with property taxes payable in 2026. new text end